District of Columbia statutes.
31-3171.15

Dissolution of the Authority.

Upon dissolution, liquidation, or other termination of the Authority:

(1)

All rights and properties of the Authority shall pass to and be vested in the District, subject to the rights of lien holders and other creditors;

(2)

Any net earnings of the Authority, beyond that necessary for retirement of any indebtedness or to implement a public purpose or program of the District authorized under this chapter, shall not inure to the benefit of any person other than the District;

(3)

The expenditure of any net earnings shall be restricted to costs related to the direct delivery of health care to residents of the District.

Mar. 2, 2012, D.C. Law 19-94, § 16, 59 DCR 213